ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 영유아용 침대 부대용품 > 아기 침대 범퍼/깔개: 아기 침대 깔개; 아기 침대 레일 커버; 아기 침대 스커트; 아기 침대 메쉬 범퍼; 아기 침대 패딩 범퍼; 이앓이용 레일 커버
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Gitter- & Kinderbettzubehör > Bettnestchen & Randschutz für Gitterbetten: Randschutz für Gitterbetten; Abdeckungen für Gitterbetten; Bezüge für Gitterbetten; Bettnestchen aus Netzstoff; Gepolsterte Bettnestchen; Beißschienenabdeckungen
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Akcesoria do łóżeczek i łóżek dziecinnych > Osłonki do łóżeczek dziecinnych: Ochraniacze do łóżeczek; Osłony poręczy łóżeczka; Falbanki do łóżeczka; Siatkowe osłonki do łóżeczek; Miękkie osłonki do łóżeczek; Osłony poręczy dla ząbkujących niemowląt
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 嬰幼兒床配件 > 嬰兒床防撞床圍: 嬰兒床襯墊; 嬰兒床欄杆罩; 嬰兒床裙; 網眼嬰兒床防撞圍; 護墊嬰兒床防撞圍; 嬰兒床欄杆口水罩
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Bebek Karyolası ve Küçük Çocuk Yatağı Aksesuarları > Bebek Karyolası Yan Koruma Yastıkları ve Kenarlıkları: Beşik Torbaları; Beşik Ray Kapakları; Beşik Etekleri; Mesh Beşik Tamponları; Yastıklı Beşik Tamponları; Diş Çıkarma Ray Kapakları
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Accessoires voor peuter- en kinderbedjes > Bedbumpers en -beveiliging: Bedbeveiliging; Bedbekleding; Bedbeveiligingsrokken; Bedbumpers van gaas; Gewatteerde bedbumpers; Bijtbare bekleding
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Acessórios para berço e cama de bebé > Protetores e forros de berço: Forros de berço; Capas para proteções de berço; Saias de berço; Proteções de berço de mesh; Proteções de berço acolchoadas; Capas para proteção de mordedores
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Dodatki za posteljice in otroške posteljice > Podloge in obloge za otroške posteljice: Obloge za otroške posteljice; Zaščitne prevleke za ograje posteljice; Zavesice za otroške posteljice; Mrežaste podloge za otroške posteljice; Oblazinjene podloge za otroške posteljice; Prevleke za grizala za posteljne stranice
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > Crib & Toddler Bed Accessories > Crib Bumpers & Liners: Crib Liners; Crib Rail Covers; Crib Skirts; Mesh Crib Bumpers; Padded Crib Bumpers; Teething Rail Covers
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Dodaci za dječje krevete i krevetiće > Ogradice i umetci za krevetić: Umetci za krevetić; Navlake za rešetke krevetića; Ukrasne plahte za krevetić; Mrežaste ogradice za krevetić; Podstavljene ogradice za krevetić; Navlake za žvakanje za rešetke krevetića
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Tremmesenge og børnesenge – tilbehør > Sengerande: Tremmesenge; Tremmesengeovertræk; Tremmesengebetræk; Sengerande i mesh; Sengerande med polstring; Sengerande med bidekant
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Acessórios para berço e cama infantil > Protetores de berço: Forros de berço; Capas para trilhos de berço; Saias para berço; Protetores de berço em malha; Protetores de berço acolchoados; Capas de trilhos de dentição
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Príslušenstvo do detských postieľok > Mantinely a podložky do detskej postieľky: Podložky do detskej postieľky; Chrániče do detskej postieľky; Závesy do detskej postieľky; Priedušné mantinely do postieľky; Polstrované mantinely do postieľky; Ochrana hrán do posieľky
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Kiságy- és csecsemőágy-kiegészítők > Kiságylökhárítók és betétek: Kiságybetétek; Kiságyrúd-takarók; Kiságyszoknyák; Hálós kiságylökhárítók; Párnázott kiságylökhárítók; Fogászati rúdtakarók
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Tillbehör till spjälsängar och barnsängar > Kuddar och insatser till spjälsängar: Spjälsäng madrassöverdrag; Spjälsäng sidoöverdrag; Spjälsängskjolar; Spjälsäng nätsidodynor; Spjälsäng vadderade sidodynor; Sidoöverdrag med bitskydd
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Accesorii pentru leagăn/pătuț pentru copii > Elemente de protecție și inserții pentru pătuț: Inserții pentru pătuț; Huse balustradă pătuț; Huse decorative pătuț; Elemente de protecție pentru pătuț cu plasă; Elemente de protecție matlasate pentru pătuț; Huse pentru balustradă pentru dentiție
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Accesorios para cunas y camas para niños > Acolchados y revestimientos para cunas: Revestimientos para cunas; Cubiertas para rieles de cuna; Faldas para cunas; Protectores para cunas de malla; Protectores para cunas acolchados; Cubiertas para rieles de dentición
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ για κούνιες & παιδικά κρεβάτια > Προφυλακτήρες & επενδύσεις κούνιας: Επένδυση κούνιας; Καλύμματα ράγας κούνιας; Υφασμάτινα διακοσμητικά καλύμματα βάσης κούνιας; Πλέγματα προστατευτικών διατάξεων βρεφικής κούνιας; Επενδυμένες προστατευτικές διατάξεις βρεφικής κούνιας; Καλύμματα ραγών για οδοντοφυΐα
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Pinnasänkyjen ja lastensänkyjen lisätarvikkeet > Pinnasänkyn pehmusteet ja reunukset: Pinnasängyn reunukset; Pinnasängyn pinnojen suojat; Pinnasängyn helmat; Verkkosängyn pehmusteet; Pehmustetun sängyn pehmusteet; Pinnojen purusuojat
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Tilbehør for vugger og barnesenger > Sengekanter for vugger: Sengetrekk; Sengeskinnetrekk; Babysengekanter; Sengekanter i netting; Polstrede sengekanter; Trekk til kantskinner
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires pour lits de bébé et d’enfant > Bordures et tours de lits de bébé: Tours de lits de bébé; Couvertures de barrière de lit de bébé; Jupons de berceau; Bordures de lits de bébé en maille; Bordures de lits de bébé rembourrées; Couvre-rails de dentition
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Accessori per lettini bambino > Paracolpi per lettino: Fodere per lettino; Coperture per spondine per lettino; Tende per lettino; Paracolpi per lettino in rete; Paracolpi per lettino imbottiti; Coperture per prodotti per dentizione
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > ベビーベッド関連用品 > ベビーベッド用ベッドガード: ベビーベッドライナー; ベビーベッドレールカバー; ベビーベッドスカート; メッシュベビーベッドバンパー; パッド入りベビーベッドバンパー; 歯固めレールカバー
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Supamųjų lovyčių ir lovyčių mažiems vaikams priedai > Supamųjų lovyčių paminkštinimai ir įklotai: Supamųjų lovyčių įklotai; Supamųjų lovyčių turėklų apvalkalai; Supamųjų lovyčių užuolaidėlės; Tinkliniai supamųjų lovyčių paminkštinimai; Kimšti supamųjų lovyčių paminkštinimai; Turėklų apvalkalai, pritaikyti kramtyti
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Аксесоари за бебешки легла и креватчета за малки деца > Протектори и обиколници за бебешки легла: Обиколници за бебешки легла; Протектори за горната част на леглото; Драперии за бебешко легло; Протектори за бебешки легла от мрежа; Омекотени протектори за бебешки легла; Протектори на леглото за зъби
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์เตียงเด็กเล็ก > ที่กันชนและที่บุรองสำหรับเตียงเด็กเล็ก: ที่บุรองสำหรับเตียงเด็กเล็ก; ผ้าคลุมขอบเตียงเด็ก; ชายกระโปรงเตียงเด็ก; ตาข่ายกันชนสำหรับเตียงเด็กเล็ก; เบาะกันชนสำหรับเตียงเด็กเล็ก; ผ้าคลุมขอบเตียงแบบกันฟันแทะ
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Dětské postýlky – příslušenství > Mantinely do dětských postýlek: Vložky do postýlek; Potahy na zábradlí do postýlek; Volánky pod matrace; Síťované mantinely do postýlek; Polstrované mantinely do postýlek; Chrániče zábradlí postýlky pro prořezávání zoubků
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Phụ kiện giường cũi em bé > Ga đệm giường cũi em bé: Ga giường cũi; Lớp màn chắn thành cũi; Vạt cũi; Lưới chắn thành cũi; Đệm chắn thành cũi; Lớp bọc gặm nướu chắn thành cũi
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Аксессуары для кроватей для детей и младенцев > Бортики и накладки для детских кроватей: Тканевые бортики в детские кровати; Накладки на перила детских кроватей; Юбки для детских кроватей; Сетчатые бортики в детские кровати; Мягкие бортики в детские кровати; Накладки-грызунки на перила детских кроватей
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 婴儿床/儿童床配件 > 婴儿床保险杆/衬垫: 婴儿床衬垫; 婴儿床栏杆罩; 婴儿床裙; 网状婴儿床保险杆; 带衬垫婴儿床保险杆; 磨牙栏杆罩